Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3601
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-3601 to 25-3604 shall be known and may be cited as the COVID-19 Liability Act.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 1.

Health Care Crisis Protocol Act, see section 71-2701.